Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB2.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 139 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) On or after the effective date of this Act, a violation shall occur when an official notice published by
the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or the commissioner of the department
instructs that taxpayers should continue to collect and remit sales and use tax on the sale, use,
storage, or other consumption of currency or bullion currency under this chapter.
(b) Any notice or instruction, published at any time, that states that on or after August 1, 2024, the sale,
use, storage, or other consumption of currency or bullion currency under this chapter is taxable is
void and unenforceable.
(2) Notwithstanding KRS 49.220 and 139.770, on and after August 1, 2024, any person who paid sales tax
under KRS 139.200 or use tax under KRS 139.310 on currency or bullion currency that is exempt from
sales and use tax under KRS 139.480(37) may maintain an action for a refund of the tax paid, as an
individual or by seeking certification as a class under Rule 23 of the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure for
a refund on behalf of the person and other persons similarly situated against the Commonwealth.
(3) An action for a refund pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, or alleging a violation under subsection
(1) of this section, may be brought in the Circuit Court of any county where the named plaintiff resides or
where the currency or bullion currency transaction took place.
(4) In addition to a refund of the sales or use tax, persons seeking a refund pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section or alleging a violation under subsection (1) of this section who prevail shall be entitled to:
(a) Prejudgment and post-judgment interest;
(b) Temporary or permanent injunctive relief;
(c) Reasonable attorney's fees and costs; and
(d) For allegations of a violation under subsection (1) of this section, liquidated damages of one
thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day that the violation occurred, which shall be paid from the
administrative budget of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the department, or the Office of
the Governor.
(5) It is the intent of the General Assembly to waive sovereign, governmental, and qualified immunity for
claims under this section, including immunity afforded to the Commonwealth pursuant to the Eleventh
Amendment to the Constitution of the United States.
(6) Any person who directs, instructs, or causes a violation of any provision of this section shall be personally,
jointly, and severally liable for any awarded damages.
Section 2. Subsection (2) of Section 1 of this Act shall be retroactive to August 1, 2024.
Section 3. Whereas taxpayer relief is critical and timely relief is necessary, an emergency is declared to
exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Veto Overridden March 27, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version